Utah statutes.
31A-5-509.   Conversion of a domestic mutual life insurance company into a
fraternal.
A domestic mutual life insurance company may be converted into a fraternal
under Chapter 9 in the following manner:
(1)  The board of directors of the company shall adopt a plan of conversion
stating:
(a)  the basis for and the purposes of the proposed action;
(b)  the proposed articles and bylaws for the new fraternal; and
(c)  the proposed procedure and estimated expenses for implementing the
conversion.
(2)  The plan shall be filed with the commissioner for approval, together with
the information under Subsection 31A-9-205 (2) required by the commissioner.
The commissioner shall approve the plan unless he finds, after a hearing,
that:
(a)  the conversion would be contrary to the law;
(b)  the new fraternal would not satisfy the requirements for a certificate of
authority under Section 31A-5-212 as incorporated by Section 31A-9-210; or
(c)  the plan would be contrary to the interests of the policyholders or the
public.
(3)  After being approved by the commissioner, the plan shall be submitted to
the policyholders for their approval.
(4)  A copy of the plan adopted by the policyholders shall be filed with the
commissioner, with a statement indicating the number and percentages of
policyholders voting, the method of voting, and the number of votes cast in
favor of the plan.
(5)  If all requirements of the law are met, the commissioner shall issue a
certificate of authority for the new fraternal.  Upon this issuance, the
mutual ceases its legal existence and the corporate existence of the new
fraternal begins.  The new fraternal is considered as having been incorporated
on the date the converted mutual was incorporated.  The new fraternal has all
of the assets and is liable for all of the obligations of the converted
mutual.  The commissioner may grant a fraternal an adjustment period, not to
exceed one year, for compliance with the requirements of Chapter 9.  The
commissioner's extension shall specify the extent to which particular
provisions of Chapter 9 do not apply.
